test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_luhhad_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - luuhâđ: # not checked
    luuhâđ+V+Inf: luuhâđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuvâm
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luuvah
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lohá
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lohheen
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luhâvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luuhâv
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luuhâp
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luhâvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: loheh
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luuhim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luuhih
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luuvâi
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: luuvâim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: luvváid
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: luvváin
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luuvâim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luuvâid
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luhhii
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: luuṿâččim
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: luuṿâččih
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: luuṿâččij
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du1: luuṿâččáim
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du2: luuṿâččáid
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du3: luuṿâččáin
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: luuṿâččijm
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: luuṿâččijd
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: luuhâeem
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: luuhâeeh
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: luuhâ
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du1: luuhâeen
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du2: luuhâvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du3: luuhâuv
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: luuhâep
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: luuhâvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Neg: luuvâ     
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNe: luvâččii 
    luuhâđ+V+PrsPrc: lohhee
    luuhâđ+V+PrfPrc: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Actio: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Ess: luhâmin
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Loc: luhâmist
    luuhâđ+V+Ger: luvâdijn
    luuhâđ+V+VAbess: luvâhánnáá


  Verb - njaahâđ: # not checked
    njaahâđ+V+Inf: njaahâđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaavâm
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njaavâh
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njááhá
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: njähheen
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: njahâvettee
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: njaahâv
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: njaahâp
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njahâvetteđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njäähih
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njaahim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njaahih
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njaavâi
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: njaaváim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: njaaváid
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njaaváin
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: njaavâim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njavâid
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njahhii
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: njaaṿâččim
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: njaaṿâččih
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: njaaṿâččij
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du1: njaaṿâččáim
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du2: njaaṿâččáid
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du3: njaaṿâččáin
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: njaaṿâččijm
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: njaaṿâččijd
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: njaahâeem
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: njaahâeeh
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: njaahâ
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du1: njaahâeen
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du2: njaahâvettee
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du3: njaahâuv
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: njaahâep
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: njaahâvetteđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njaah
    njaahâđ+V+PrsPrc: lohhee
    njaahâđ+V+PrfPrc: luuhâm
    njaahâđ+V+Actio: luuhâm
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Ess: luhâmin
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Loc: luhâmist
    njaahâđ+V+Ger: luvâdijn
    njaahâđ+V+VAbe: luvâhânnáá
    
